Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 419C.380 is amended to read:
419C.380. (1) An evaluation  ordered under ORS 419C.378 must be conducted by a psychiatrist,
a licensed psychologist or a regulated social worker. If an evaluation is requested, the  party at
whose request the evaluation was ordered shall notify the court and other parties of the date, time
and location of the evaluation and the name of the evaluator chosen by  the party. A party or the
court may submit written  information to the evaluator for consideration. When written information
that has not been  provided to the court or an opposing party is submitted to the evaluator, the party
submitting the written information to the evaluator shall provide the written information to the
court and the opposing party.
(2)(a) Upon motion of  the youth, or upon the court’s own motion, a court shall determine
whether the youth is financially eligible under the policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines of
the Public Defense Services Commission.
(b) If a county court or justice court determines that the youth is financially  eligible, the court
shall order the county  to pay the fees and costs described in subsection (3) of this section from funds
available for that purpose.
(c) If a circuit court determines that the youth is financially eligible,  the court shall order the
public defense services executive director to pay the fees and costs described in subsection (3)  of
this section from funds available for that purpose.
(3) If a court determines that a youth is financially eligible under subsection (2)  of this section,
the court shall order that:
(a) A reasonable fee be paid to a psychiatrist,  licensed psychologist or regulated social worker
in private practice who conducts the evaluation; and
(b) All costs, including transportation of the youth,  be paid if the evaluation is conducted by a
psychiatrist,  licensed  psychologist or regulated social worker employed by the Department of Human
Services or is conducted by a  community mental health program or community developmental disa-
bilities program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.695.
(4) If an evaluation is ordered under ORS 419C.378 at the request of or with  the acquiescence
of a youth, and the youth  is determined not to be financially eligible under subsection (2) of this
section, the evaluation shall be performed at the youth’s expense.
Enrolled Senate Bill 49 (SB 49-A) Page 1
(5) If an evaluation is  ordered under ORS 419C.378 at the request of the district attorney or
juvenile department, the county shall pay for the expense of the evaluation.
(6) After a motion  is made by the court or the youth under ORS 419C.378 (3), the state shall
have the right to seek an independent evaluation at its own expense.
(7) A youth may not be removed from  the youth’s current placement for the purpose of
an evaluation performed under this section unless the youth has been placed  in a detention
facility as defined in ORS 419A.004 or a youth correction facility as defined in ORS 420.005.
SECTION 2. ORS 419C.384 is repealed.
SECTION 3.  ORS 419C.398 is amended to read:
419C.398. (1) A youth may not be removed from the youth’s current placement solely for the
purpose of receiving restorative services pursuant to a court order  under ORS 419C.392 unless the
court finds:
(a) That removal is necessary to provide restorative services under ORS 419C.396;
(b) That removal is in the best interest of the youth; and
(c) If the Department of Human Services has custody of the youth, that:
(A) The department made reasonable  efforts to prevent or eliminate the need for removal and
make it possible for the youth to safely return to the youth’s current placement; or
(B) Reasonable efforts have not been made by the  department but reasonable efforts would not
have eliminated the need for removal under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) If a youth is removed for the purpose of receiving restorative services, the youth shall  be
returned to the youth’s current placement immediately upon  conclusion of the provision of the
restorative services unless the youth has been placed in a  detention facility as defined in ORS
419A.004 or a youth correction facility as defined in ORS 420.005 .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 419C.396 is amended to read:
419C.396. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall arrange for the provision of or begin providing
restorative  services  within 30 days after receiving a court order under ORS 419C.392 (3). The au-
thority shall send a report to the court, with copies  to the parties to the proceeding initiated by a
petition alleging jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005, no later than 90 days after receipt of the order.
The report must describe  the nature and duration of restorative services provided, indicate whether
the youth is  fit to proceed or presents a substantial probability of gaining or regaining fitness to
proceed and recommend  whether restorative services should be continued and, if so, the type and
duration of the services.
(2) Within 14 days after receiving a report under subsection (1) of this section, the court  shall
determine the youth’s fitness to proceed.
(3) Upon the recommendation of the authority, the request of a party or the court’s  own motion,
the court may hold a review hearing concerning the evaluation of the youth’s fitness  to proceed at
any time during which restorative services are provided pursuant to an order  under ORS 419C.392
(3). After a review hearing, the court shall determine the youth’s fitness to proceed.
(4) If  the court finds that a youth is fit to proceed, the court shall vacate the stay under ORS
419C.378.
(5) If the court finds that the youth remains  unfit to proceed and that there is not a substantial
probability that the youth will gain or regain fitness to proceed in  the foreseeable future, the court
shall:
(a) Immediately enter a judgment that dismisses the petition  alleging jurisdiction under ORS
419C.005 without prejudice; or
(b) If  necessary for planning or instituting an alternative proceeding, then not more than five
days after the findings are made enter a judgment that dismisses the petition without prejudice.
(6) If the court finds under subsection (2) or (3) of this section that the youth  remains unfit to
proceed, but that the youth presents a substantial probability  of gaining or regaining fitness to
proceed, the court shall order that restorative services  be continued. The court shall order the au-
thority to send a report to the court, with  copies to the parties, within a specified time, not to ex-
ceed 90 days from the time the order is filed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 49 (SB 49-A) Page 2
(7) If the court finds under subsection (2) or  (3) of this section that a youth remains unfit to
proceed, the youth shall be discharged within a period of time that is reasonable for making a  de-
termination whether the  youth presents a substantial probability of gaining or regaining fitness to
proceed. Regardless of the number of acts the petition alleging  jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005 al-
leges that the youth committed, the  youth may not be continued in restorative services for longer
than whichever of the following, measured from the date the petition is filed, is shorter:
(a) Three years; or
(b) The period of time that is equal to the maximum commitment the  court could have imposed
if the petition had been adjudicated.
(8)(a) If the court orders placement  for restorative services, the court may specify the type of
care, supervision, security  or services to be provided by the authority to any youth placed in the
custody of the Department of Human Services and to the parents or guardians of the youth.
(b) The authority, in [ consultation with the department ] coordination with the Department of
Human Services, the local juvenile department and the youth’s family , may place the youth in
any facility  authorized to accept the youth and provide the necessary services and care  that are
most appropriate for the youth .
(c) The authority shall continue to provide restorative services  wherever the youth is
placed.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 419C.380, 419C.396 and 419C.398 by sections 1, 3 and
4 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of ORS 419C.384  by section 2 of this 2017 Act apply to court
orders for fitness to proceed evaluations and restorative services made on  or after the ef-
fective date of this 2017 Act.
Passed by Senate June 19, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 49 (SB 49-A) Page 3